Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4903
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Quality Jobs Act, the definitions found in sections 77-4904 to 77-4926 shall be used.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 3.